Tennessee statutes. Title 57 Intoxicating Liquors
Part 9

Unfair Wine Sales Law

57-3-901. Short title.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the “Unfair Wine Sales Law.”

Acts 2014, ch. 554, § 30.

57-3-902. Part definitions.

As used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Basic cost of wine” means the invoice cost of wine to the retailer in the quantity last purchased from the wholesaler at prices generally available in the marketplace, absent any cash or other discounts, incentives and/or concessions of any kind, whether such discounts, incentives or concessions are offered within or outside of this state, to which shall be added the full face value of any taxes, freight or delivery fees which may be required by any tax law of this state imposed upon wine supplied to retailers now in effect or hereafter enacted, and any other taxes or fees imposed by this title, if not already included by the wholesaler in this price;

“Commission” means the alcoholic beverage commission;

“Cost of doing business by the retailer” is twenty percent (20%) of the basic cost of wine to the retailer;

“Cost to the retailer” means the “basic cost of wine” to the retailer plus the “cost of doing business by the retailer”; and

“Prices generally available in the marketplace” shall mean the price of wine based upon a purchase from a wholesaler on terms and conditions:

Typically available to nonfood store retailers in the trade area in which the retailer is located; and

In accordance with the requirements set forth in §§ 57-3-811, 57-3-812 and 57-3-813;

“Retailer” shall mean the holder of a retail food store wine license issued under § 57-3-803 or the holder of a retailer license under § 57-3-204;

“Sell at retail,” “sales at retail” or “retail sales” means and includes any transfer of title to tangible personal property for a valuable consideration made in the ordinary course of trade or usual prosecution of the seller's business, to the purchaser for consumption or use; and

“Wholesaler” has the same meaning as provided in § 57-3-101(a).

Acts 2014, ch. 554, § 30.

57-3-903. Advertising, offering for sale or selling wine at less than cost — Misdemeanor — Prima facie violation of part.

It is a Class C misdemeanor for any retailer to advertise, offer to sell, or sell at retail, wine at less than cost to the retailer.

The advertising, sale or offer to sell of wine by any retailer at less than cost to the retailer shall be prima facie evidence of both a violation of this part, and of intent to injure competitors or destroy substantially or lessen competition.

Acts 2014, ch. 554, § 30.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

57-3-904. Assisting or aiding violation of part — Penalty.

Any individual who, as a director, officer, partner, member, or agent of any person violating this part, assists or aids, directly or indirectly, in such violation, equally with the person for whom such individual acts, commits a Class C misdemeanor.

Acts 2014, ch. 554, § 30.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

57-3-905. Contracts in violation of part illegal and void.

Any contract, express or implied, made by any person, firm, or corporation in violation of any of the provisions of this part is declared to be an illegal and void contract and no recovery thereon shall be had.

Acts 2014, ch. 554, § 30.

57-3-906. Equitable action to enjoin violation — Recovery of damages and costs — Action for damages alone permitted.

Any person or entity injured by any violation of this part, or any trade association which is representative of such a person or entity, may maintain an action in any court of equitable jurisdiction to prevent, restrain, or enjoin such violation.

If, in such action, a violation of this part shall be established, the court shall enjoin and restrain or otherwise prohibit such violation and, in addition thereto, shall assess in favor of the plaintiff and against the defendant the costs of the suit.

In such action, it shall not be necessary that actual damages to the plaintiff be alleged or proved, but where alleged and proved, the plaintiff in the action, in addition to such injunctive relief and costs of suit, shall be entitled to recover from the defendant the amount of actual damages sustained by the plaintiff.

In the event no injunctive relief is sought or required, any person injured by a violation of this part may maintain an action for damages alone in any court of general jurisdiction, and the measure of damages in such action shall be the same as prescribed in subsection (a).

Acts 2014, ch. 554, § 30.

57-3-907. Restrictions on sales by retail food stores.

No retail food store as defined in §57-3-802 shall sell, offer for sale or advertise the sale of:

Two (2) or more items, at least one (1) of which items is wine, at a combined price; or

Liquor, spirits or high alcohol content beer.

Acts 2014, ch. 554, § 30.

57-3-908.
Commission to enforce part — Civil penalties — Petition for hearing.

The commission shall administer and enforce this part.

For an initial violation or noncompliance with any provision of this part by a retailer, a penalty shall be imposed not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000);

For any second violation or noncompliance with any provision of this part by any retailer who has previously been found in violation pursuant to subdivision (b)(1), a penalty shall be imposed not to exceed two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500); and

For any subsequent violation or violations or noncompliance with any provision of this part, by any retailer who has previously been found in violation pursuant to subdivision (b)(2), a penalty shall be imposed not to exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000).

Any retailer who is assessed a civil penalty pursuant to this section, and who continues to engage in the unauthorized sale, distribution or handling of wine in this state, either directly or through any agent or third party acting on behalf of such retailer, shall be charged with an additional violation of this part.

Any retailer who is adversely affected by a decision of the commission may petition the commission for a hearing which will be held in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, part 3.

In enforcing this part, the commission shall consider the cost and effectiveness of administration and endeavor to administer this part in the most cost-efficient manner.

Acts 2014, ch. 554, § 30.

57-3-909. Exceptions from application of part.

This part shall not apply to sales at retail made where wines are:

Sold upon the complete final liquidation of a business;

Advertised, offered for sale, or sold by any fiduciary or other officer acting under the order or direction of any court;

Closeouts and case discounts; or

Such other occasional discounts as defined by the commission.

Acts 2014, ch. 554, § 30.